Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB133.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) Unlawful storage of a firearm is storing or leaving a
firearm that is not secured by a trigger lock mechanism, placed in a
securely locked safe, box or other container or placed in some other
location that a reasonable person would believe to be secure from any
minor gaining access to such firearm and when such firearm is:
(1) Accessed by a minor;
(2) used by a minor to cause bodily harm to another person; or
(3) used by a minor to cause great bodily harm to or the death of
another person.
(b) Unlawful storage of a firearm as defined in:
(1) Subsection (a)(1) is a class C person misdemeanor;
(2) subsection (a)(2) is a severity level 9, person felony; and
(3) subsection (a)(3) is a severity level 5, person felony.
(c) It shall not be a violation of subsection (a) if at the time the
firearm was accessed or used by a minor:
(1) The firearm was inoperable;
(2) the firearm was within the firearm owner's immediate access and
control;
(3) the minor unlawfully entered the area where the firearm was
stored or left; or
(4) the firearm was used by a minor in lawful defense of the minor's
person, another person or the minor's property.
(d) As used in this section, "minor" means any person under 18 years
of age.
(e) This section shall be known and may be cited as the responsible
gun ownership act.
(f) This section shall be a part of and supplemental to the Kansas
criminal code.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.